Vermont, session 2025-2026, H879.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Aquatic nuisance and invasive species are a threat to Vermont native
species as they compete with native species for habitat and resources. Further,
aquatic nuisance and invasive species can cause economic harm due to the loss
of commercial and recreational opportunities they can cause.
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 2 of 11
(2) According to the Lake Champlain Basin Program, as of 2020, there
were 51 known nonnative and invasive species identified in Lake Champlain
and, as of 2022, there were 126 waterbodies in Vermont that had confirmed
aquatic invasive species.
(3) According to the 2019 U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s The
Great Lakes and Lake Champlain Invasive Species Program report, prevention
is the most effective and least costly method for managing aquatic nuisance
and invasive species threats to Vermont’s waters.
(4) It is the policy of the State of Vermont to follow the precautionary
principle and use pesticides as a measure of last resort in aquatic nuisance
control after other nonchemical methods have failed and it has been proven by
the applicant that there will be no or negligible harm to nontarget species, be
they reptiles, amphibians, fish, or aquatic biota.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1452 is amended to read:
§ 1452. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Natural Resources.
(2) “Aquatic nuisance” means undesirable or excessive substances or
populations that interfere with the recreational potential or aquatic habitat of a
body of water, including rooted aquatic plants and animal and algal
populations. Aquatic nuisances include zebra mussels (Dreissena
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 3 of 11
polymorpha), quagga mussels (Dreissena bugensis), Asian clam (Corbicula
fluminea), fishhook waterflea (Cercopagis pengoi), rusty crayfish (Orconectes
rusticus), spiny waterflea (Bythotrephes longimanus), or other species
identified by the Secretary by rule.
* * *
(8) “Pesticide” means any substance produced, distributed, or used for
preventing, destroying, or repelling nuisance aquatic plants, insects, or other
aquatic life, including lamprey. Pesticide “Pesticide” includes unicellular
organisms or extracts from unicellular organisms and does not include
biological controls.
(9) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
* * *
(11) “Waters” means all rivers, streams, creeks, brooks, reservoirs,
ponds, lakes, and springs and all bodies of surface waters, artificial or natural,
that are contained within, flow through, or border upon the State or any portion
of it.
* * *
(17) “Lake association” means a lake protection organization registered
with the Secretary of Natural Resources on a form provided by the Secretary.
* * *
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 4 of 11
(23) “Lake” means a body of standing water, including a pond or a
reservoir that may have natural or artificial water level control. Private ponds
are not considered lakes.
(24) “Lake segment” means the segments of Lake Champlain identified
in the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s publication Phosphorus
TMDLs for Vermont Segments of Lake Champlain.
(25) “Private pond” means a body of standing water that is a natural
waterbody of not more than 20 acres located on property owned by a person or
an artificial waterbody of any size located on property owned by a person. A
“private pond” includes a reservoir specifically constructed for one of the
following purposes: snowmaking storage, golf course irrigation, stormwater
management, or fire suppression.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 1455 is amended to read:
§ 1455. AQUATIC NUISANCE CONTROL PERMIT
(a) A person shall not use pesticides, chemicals other than pesticides,
biological controls, bottom barriers, structural barriers, structural controls, or
powered mechanical devices in waters of the State to control nuisance aquatic
plants, insects, or other aquatic nuisances, including lamprey, unless that
person has been issued a permit by the Secretary, unless otherwise provided by
this section.
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 5 of 11
(b) Notwithstanding other requirements set forth in chapter 47 of this title
to the contrary, the Secretary may issue permits under this section, unless
otherwise provided by this section.
(c)(1) Persons desiring a permit under this section shall make application to
the Secretary on a form prescribed by the Secretary The following may apply
for a permit for the use of pesticides or chemicals other than pesticides in a
water:
(A) For a private pond, the owner of the property where the pond is
located may apply for a permit.
(B) For waters other than private ponds, only a municipality in which
the body of water is located or a lake association in conjunction with a
municipality may apply for a permit for the use of pesticides or chemicals
other than pesticides in a water. If there is more than one lake association for a
lake, all of the lake associations shall be required to be applicants for the
permit. If there is more than one municipality in which the relevant water is
located, all of the municipalities shall be required to be applicants for the
permit.
(2) Applications under this section shall be submitted on a form
prescribed by the Commissioner.
(3) When an application is for the use of a pesticide or chemical other
than a pesticide in Lake Champlain, the relevant water subject to review shall
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 6 of 11
be the lake segment or lake segments in which the pesticide or chemical other
than a pesticide is proposed for use.
(d) The Secretary shall, after obtaining the additional approvals required
under subsection (f) of this section, may issue a permit for the use of pesticides
or chemicals other than pesticides in waters of the State for the control of
nuisance aquatic plants, insects, or other aquatic life, including lamprey, when
the applicant demonstrates and the Secretary finds or requires all of the
following:
(1) there is no reasonable nonchemical alternative available; The use of
pesticides or chemicals other than pesticides is needed to address significant
ecological harm in the water.
(2) there is acceptable risk to the nontarget environment; The use of
nonchemical methods to address the significant ecological harm in the water is
not feasible and there would be negligible risk to public health.
(3) there is negligible risk to public health; The risks of using pesticides
or chemicals other than pesticides to address significant ecological harm do not
outweigh the benefits of using the pesticides or other chemicals. When
determining the risk of ecological harm, the Department of Fish and Wildlife
shall be responsible for selecting the most sensitive nontarget plant species and
the most sensitive animal species that reside in the water and that would be at
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 7 of 11
risk of harm due to chemical exposure to be used as the baseline nontarget
species.
(4) If the use of pesticides or chemicals other than pesticides is
authorized, a long-range management plan has been developed which
incorporates a schedule of pesticide minimization; and.
(5) there is a public benefit to be achieved from the application of a
pesticide or, in the case of a pond located entirely on a landowner’s property,
no undue adverse effect upon the public good If the use of pesticides or
chemicals other than pesticides is authorized, staff of the Agency of Natural
Resources shall be present for any application of the pesticide or chemical to
monitor for the proper application location, application rates, and frequency of
application.
(e) The burden of meeting the permitting criteria set forth under subsection
(d) of this section shall be on the applicant. A landowner applying to use a
pesticide on a private pond located entirely on the landowner’s property is
exempt from the requirement of subdivision (d)(4) of this section.
(f) The Commissioner of Environmental Conservation, the Commissioner
of Fish and Wildlife, and the Commissioner of Health shall jointly approve any
application to use pesticides or chemicals other than pesticides to treat an
aquatic nuisance under this section.
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 8 of 11
(g) The Secretary shall, upon application of any person, may issue a permit
for the control of aquatic nuisances by biological controls, bottom barriers,
structural barriers, structural controls, or powered mechanical devices, or
chemicals other than pesticides when the Secretary finds:
(1) there is acceptable risk to the nontarget environment a proven
negligible risk to the most sensitive nontarget species in the water;
(2) there is negligible risk to public health; and
(3) there is either benefit to or no undue adverse effect upon the public
good.
(g)(h) The use of bottom barriers, structural barriers, structural controls,
powered mechanical devices, and copper compounds as an algaecide in waters
with a surface area of one acre or less located entirely on a person’s property
and with an outlet where the flow can be controlled for at least three days is
exempt from the permit requirements of this section.
(h)(i) When an application is filed under this section, the Secretary shall
proceed with a Type 2 notice and comment procedure in accordance with
chapter 170 of this title.
(i)(j) An aquatic nuisance control permit issued under this section shall
include all of the following:
(1) specify in writing the The Secretary’s findings under subsection (d)
or (f)(g) of this section;.
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 9 of 11
(2) specify the The location, manner, nature, and frequency of the
permitted activity;.
(3) contain Any additional conditions, requirements, and restrictions as
the Secretary deems necessary to preserve and protect the quality of the
receiving waters, to protect the public health, and to minimize the impact on
the nontarget environment. Such conditions may include requirements
concerning recording, reporting, and monitoring;.
(4) be valid for the A period of time specified in for which the permit is
valid, not to exceed five three years for chemical control, and not to exceed ten
three years for nonchemical control.
(j)(k) An aquatic nuisance control permit issued under this chapter may be
renewed from time to time upon application to the Secretary. The process of
permit renewal will shall be consistent with the requirements of this section.
(k)(l) An applicant for a permit under this section shall pay an application
fee as required by 3 V.S.A. § 2822. The Agency of Natural Resources shall be
exempt from this fee requirement.
(l)(m) No permit shall be required under this section for mosquito control
activities that are regulated by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets,
provided that:
(1) Prior prior to authorizing the use of larvicides or pupacides in waters
of the State, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall designate
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 10 of 11
acceptable control products and methods for their use and issue permits
pursuant to 6 V.S.A. § 1083(a)(5); and
(2) [Repealed.]
(m)(n) The Secretary may issue general permits for the use of nonchemical
aquatic nuisance control activities provided that the Secretary makes the
findings required in subsection (f)(g) of this section. A general permit issued
under this subsection is not required to specify the exact location or the
frequency of the permitted activity.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 7713(a) is amended to read:
(a) Purpose; scope.
(1) The purpose of this section is to establish the public notice and
comment requirements that the Department must follow when considering
applications for individual permits, except for individual permits specifically
listed in other sections of this subchapter, and when considering other permits
listed in this section.
(2) The procedures under this section shall be known as Type 2
Procedures. This section governs an application for each of the following:
(A) an individual permit issued pursuant to the Secretary’s authority
under this title and 29 V.S.A. chapter 11, except for permits governed by
sections 7712 and 7714–7716 of this chapter;
(B) [Repealed.]
VT LEG #386700 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.879
2026 Page 11 of 11
(C) an individual shoreland permit under chapter 49A of this title;
(D) a public water system source permit under section 1675 of this
title;
(E) a provisional certification issued under section 6605d of this title;
and
(F) a corrective action plan under section 6648 of this title; and
(G) an aquatic nuisance control permit under section 1455 of this
title.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2026, provided that the permitting standards and requirements of
10 V.S.A. § 1455 enacted under Sec. 3 shall not apply to:
(1) any proposed activity where the necessary State permit under
10 V.S.A. chapter 50 has been obtained prior to January 1, 2026, and the
permit holder takes no subsequent act that would require revision of the permit
or a new permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 50; or
(2) a complete application for a proposed activity requiring a State
permit under 10 V.S.A chapter 50 that has been submitted on or before January
1, 2026, provided that the applicant does not subsequently file an application
for a permit amendment and performance of the activity applied for
commences within two years after the date that the State permit becomes final.
VT LEG #386700 v.1